Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.788

[Art. 132] Frauds against the government.

Any person subject to this code:

(1) Who, knowing it to be false or fraudulent:

(a) Makes any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof; or

(b) Presents to any person in the civil or military service thereof, for approval or payment any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof;

(2) Who, for the purpose of obtaining the approval, allowance, or payment of any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof:

(a) Makes or uses any writing or other paper knowing it to contain any false or fraudulent statements;

(b) Makes any oath to any fact or to any writing or other paper knowing the oath to be false; or

(c) Forges or counterfeits any signature upon any writing or other paper, or uses any such signature knowing it to be forged or counterfeited;

(3) Who, having charge, possession, custody, or control of any money, or other property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia, knowingly delivers to any person having authority to receive it, any amount thereof less than that for which the person receives a certificate or receipt; or

(4) Who, being authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the receipt of any property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the organized militia, makes or delivers to any person such writing without having full knowledge of the truth of the statements therein contained and with intent to defraud the United States or the state;

shall, upon conviction, be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 1989 c 48 s 70; 1963 c 220 s 116.]